test/src/dict-gt-yamls/U-sanit_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
  Noun - laŋkku:
    laŋkku+N+Sg+Nom:  laŋkku
    laŋkku+N+Sg+Gen:  laaŋku
    laŋkku+N+Sg+Acc:  laaŋku
    laŋkku+N+Sg+Ill:  laaŋkun
    laŋkku+N+Sg+Loc:  laaŋkust
    laŋkku+N+Sg+Com:  laŋkkuin
    laŋkku+N+Sg+Abe:  laˊŋkuttáá
    laŋkku+N+Ess:  laŋkkun
    laŋkku+N+Par:  laŋkkud
    laŋkku+N+Pl+Nom:  laaŋkuh
    laŋkku+N+Pl+Gen: [laaŋkui, laˊŋkui]
    laŋkku+N+Pl+Acc:  laaŋkuid
    laŋkku+N+Pl+Ill:  laŋkkuid
    laŋkku+N+Pl+Loc:  laaŋkuin
    laŋkku+N+Pl+Com:  laˊŋkuiguin
    laŋkku+N+Pl+Abe:  laˊŋkuittáá

  Noun - tavlu:
    tavlu+N+Sg+Nom:  tavlu
    tavlu+N+Sg+Gen:  taavlu
    tavlu+N+Sg+Acc:  taavlu
    tavlu+N+Sg+Ill:  taavlun
    tavlu+N+Sg+Loc:  taavlust
    tavlu+N+Sg+Com:  tavluin
    tavlu+N+Sg+Abe:  taˊvluttáá
    tavlu+N+Ess:  tavlun
    tavlu+N+Par:  tavlud
    tavlu+N+Pl+Nom:  taavluh
    tavlu+N+Pl+Gen: [taavlui, taˊvlui]
    tavlu+N+Pl+Acc:  taavluid
    tavlu+N+Pl+Ill:  tavluid
    tavlu+N+Pl+Loc:  taavluin
    tavlu+N+Pl+Com:  taˊvluiguin
    tavlu+N+Pl+Abe:  taˊvluittáá

  Noun - lamppu:
    lamppu+N+Sg+Nom:  lamppu
    lamppu+N+Sg+Gen:  laampu
    lamppu+N+Sg+Acc:  laampu
    lamppu+N+Sg+Ill:  laampun
    lamppu+N+Sg+Loc:  laampust
    lamppu+N+Sg+Com:  lamppuin
    lamppu+N+Sg+Abe:  laˊmputtáá
    lamppu+N+Ess:  lamppun
    lamppu+N+Par:  lamppud
    lamppu+N+Pl+Nom:  laampuh
    lamppu+N+Pl+Gen: [laampui, laˊmpui]
    lamppu+N+Pl+Acc:  laampuid
    lamppu+N+Pl+Ill:  lamppuid
    lamppu+N+Pl+Loc:  laampuin
    lamppu+N+Pl+Com:  laˊmpuiguin
    lamppu+N+Pl+Abe:  laˊmpuittáá

  Noun - harppu:
    harppu+N+Sg+Nom:  harppu
    harppu+N+Sg+Gen:  haarpu
    harppu+N+Sg+Acc:  haarpu
    harppu+N+Sg+Ill:  haarpun
    harppu+N+Sg+Loc:  haarpust
    harppu+N+Sg+Com:  harppuin
    harppu+N+Sg+Abe:  haˊrputtáá
    harppu+N+Ess:  harppun
    harppu+N+Par:  harppud
    harppu+N+Pl+Nom:  haarpuh
    harppu+N+Pl+Gen: [haarpui, haˊrpui]
    harppu+N+Pl+Acc:  haarpuid
    harppu+N+Pl+Ill:  harppuid
    harppu+N+Pl+Loc:  haarpuin
    harppu+N+Pl+Com:  haˊrpuiguin
    harppu+N+Pl+Abe:  haˊrpuittáá

  Noun - lanttu:
    lanttu+N+Sg+Nom:  lanttu
    lanttu+N+Sg+Gen:  laantu
    lanttu+N+Sg+Acc:  laantu
    lanttu+N+Sg+Ill:  laantun
    lanttu+N+Sg+Loc:  laantust
    lanttu+N+Sg+Com:  lanttuin
    lanttu+N+Sg+Abe:  laˊntuttáá
    lanttu+N+Ess:  lanttun
    lanttu+N+Par:  lanttud
    lanttu+N+Pl+Nom:  laantuh
    lanttu+N+Pl+Gen: [laantui, laˊntui]
    lanttu+N+Pl+Acc:  laantuid
    lanttu+N+Pl+Ill:  lanttuid
    lanttu+N+Pl+Loc:  laantuin
    lanttu+N+Pl+Com:  laˊntuiguin
    lanttu+N+Pl+Abe:  laˊntuittáá

  Noun - lenccu:
    lenccu+N+Sg+Nom:  lenccu
    lenccu+N+Sg+Gen:  leencu
    lenccu+N+Sg+Acc:  leencu
    lenccu+N+Sg+Ill:  leencun
    lenccu+N+Sg+Loc:  leencust
    lenccu+N+Sg+Com:  lenccuin
    lenccu+N+Sg+Abe:  leˊncuttáá
    lenccu+N+Ess:  lenccun
    lenccu+N+Par:  lenccud
    lenccu+N+Pl+Nom:  leencuh
    lenccu+N+Pl+Gen: [leencui, leˊncui]
    lenccu+N+Pl+Acc:  leencuid
    lenccu+N+Pl+Ill:  lenccuid
    lenccu+N+Pl+Loc:  leencuin
    lenccu+N+Pl+Com:  leˊncuiguin
    lenccu+N+Pl+Abe:  leˊncuittáá

  Noun - lippu:
    lippu+N+Sg+Nom:  lippu
    lippu+N+Sg+Gen:  liipu
    lippu+N+Sg+Ill:  liipun
    lippu+N+Sg+Loc:  liipust
    lippu+N+Sg+Com:  lippuin
    lippu+N+Sg+Abe:  liˊputtáá
    lippu+N+Ess:  lippun
    lippu+N+Pl+Nom:  liipuh
    lippu+N+Pl+Gen: [liipui, liˊpui]
    lippu+N+Pl+Acc:  liipuid
    lippu+N+Pl+Ill:  lippuid
    lippu+N+Pl+Loc:  liipuin
    lippu+N+Pl+Com:  liˊpuiguin
    lippu+N+Pl+Abe:  liˊpuittáá

  Noun - torttu:
    torttu+N+Sg+Nom:  torttu
    torttu+N+Sg+Gen:  toortu
    torttu+N+Sg+Acc:  toortu
    torttu+N+Sg+Ill:  toortun
    torttu+N+Sg+Loc:  toortust
    torttu+N+Sg+Com:  torttuin
    torttu+N+Sg+Abe:  toˊrtuttáá
    torttu+N+Ess:  torttun
    torttu+N+Par:  torttud
    torttu+N+Pl+Nom:  toortuh
    torttu+N+Pl+Gen: [toortui, toˊrtui]
    torttu+N+Pl+Acc:  toortuid
    torttu+N+Pl+Ill:  torttuid
    torttu+N+Pl+Loc:  toortuin
    torttu+N+Pl+Com:  toˊrtuiguin
    torttu+N+Pl+Abe:  toˊrtuittáá

  Noun - rumbu:
    rumbu+N+Sg+Nom:  rumbu
    rumbu+N+Sg+Gen:  ruumbu
    rumbu+N+Sg+Acc:  ruumbu
    rumbu+N+Sg+Ill:  ruumbun
    rumbu+N+Sg+Loc:  ruumbust
    rumbu+N+Sg+Com:  rumbuin
    rumbu+N+Sg+Abe:  ruˊmbuttáá
    rumbu+N+Ess:  rumbun
    rumbu+N+Par:  rumbud
    rumbu+N+Pl+Nom:  ruumbuh
    rumbu+N+Pl+Gen: [ruumbui, ruˊmbui]
    rumbu+N+Pl+Acc:  ruumbuid
    rumbu+N+Pl+Ill:  rumbuid
    rumbu+N+Pl+Loc:  ruumbuin
    rumbu+N+Pl+Com:  ruˊmbuiguin
    rumbu+N+Pl+Abe:  ruˊmbuittáá

  Noun - pumppu:
    pumppu+N+Sg+Nom:  pumppu
    pumppu+N+Sg+Gen:  puumpu
    pumppu+N+Sg+Acc:  puumpu
    pumppu+N+Sg+Ill:  puumpun
    pumppu+N+Sg+Loc:  puumpust
    pumppu+N+Sg+Com:  pumppuin
    pumppu+N+Sg+Abe:  puˊmputtáá
    pumppu+N+Ess:  pumppun
    pumppu+N+Par:  pumppud
    pumppu+N+Pl+Nom:  puumpuh
    pumppu+N+Pl+Gen: [puumpui, puˊmpui]
    pumppu+N+Pl+Acc:  puumpuid
    pumppu+N+Pl+Ill:  pumppuid
    pumppu+N+Pl+Loc:  puumpuin
    pumppu+N+Pl+Com:  puˊmpuiguin
    pumppu+N+Pl+Abe:  puˊmpuittáá

  Noun - ruvdu:
    ruvdu+N+Sg+Nom:  ruvdu
    ruvdu+N+Sg+Gen:  ruuvdu
    ruvdu+N+Sg+Acc:  ruuvdu
    ruvdu+N+Sg+Ill:  ruuvdun
    ruvdu+N+Sg+Loc:  ruuvdust
    ruvdu+N+Sg+Com:  ruvduin
    ruvdu+N+Sg+Abe:  ruˊvduttáá
    ruvdu+N+Ess:  ruvdun
    ruvdu+N+Par:  ruvdud
    ruvdu+N+Pl+Nom:  ruuvduh
    ruvdu+N+Pl+Gen: [ruuvdui, ruˊvdui]
    ruvdu+N+Pl+Acc:  ruuvduid
    ruvdu+N+Pl+Ill:  ruvduid
    ruvdu+N+Pl+Loc:  ruuvduin
    ruvdu+N+Pl+Com:  ruˊvduiguin
    ruvdu+N+Pl+Abe:  ruˊvduittáá

  Noun - ákku: # ok LAAVU
    ákku+N+Sg+Nom:  ákku
    ákku+N+Sg+Gen:  ááhu
    ákku+N+Sg+Acc:  ááhu
    ákku+N+Sg+Ill:  áákun
    ákku+N+Sg+Loc:  ááhust
    ákku+N+Sg+Com:  áhhoin
    ákku+N+Sg+Abe:  áˊhuttáá
    ákku+N+Ess:  ákkun
    ákku+N+Par:  ákkud
    ákku+N+Pl+Nom:  ááhuh
    ákku+N+Pl+Gen: [ááhui, áˊhui]
    ákku+N+Pl+Acc:  ááhuid
    ákku+N+Pl+Ill:  áhhoid
    ákku+N+Pl+Loc:  ááhuin
    ákku+N+Pl+Com:  áˊhuiguin
    ákku+N+Pl+Abe:  áˊhuittáá

  Noun - reppu: # ok LAAVU
    reppu+N+Sg+Nom:  reppu
    reppu+N+Sg+Gen:  reepu
    reppu+N+Sg+Acc:  reepu
    reppu+N+Sg+Ill:  reepun
    reppu+N+Sg+Loc:  reepust
    reppu+N+Sg+Com:  reppuin
    reppu+N+Sg+Abe:  reˊputtáá
    reppu+N+Ess:  reppun
    reppu+N+Par:  reppud
    reppu+N+Pl+Nom:  reepuh
    reppu+N+Pl+Gen: [reepui, reˊpui]
    reppu+N+Pl+Acc:  reepuid
    reppu+N+Pl+Ill:  reppuid
    reppu+N+Pl+Loc:  reepuin
    reppu+N+Pl+Com:  reˊpuiguin
    reppu+N+Pl+Abe:  reˊpuittáá

  Noun - váddu: # ok LAAVU
    váddu+N+Sg+Nom:  váddu
    váddu+N+Sg+Gen:  váádu
    váddu+N+Sg+Acc:  váádu
    váddu+N+Sg+Ill:  váádun
    váddu+N+Sg+Loc:  váádust
    váddu+N+Sg+Com:  váddoin
    váddu+N+Sg+Abe:  váˊduttáá
    váddu+N+Ess:  váddun
    váddu+N+Par:  váddud
    váddu+N+Pl+Nom:  vááduh
    váddu+N+Pl+Gen: [váádui, váˊdui]
    váddu+N+Pl+Acc:  vááduid
    váddu+N+Pl+Ill:  váddoid
    váddu+N+Pl+Loc:  vááduin
    váddu+N+Pl+Com:  váˊduiguin
    váddu+N+Pl+Abe:  váˊduittáá

  Noun - nággu: # ok LAAVU
    nággu+N+Sg+Nom:  nággu
    nággu+N+Sg+Gen:  náágu
    nággu+N+Sg+Acc:  náágu
    nággu+N+Sg+Ill:  náágun
    nággu+N+Sg+Loc:  náágust
    nággu+N+Sg+Com:  nággoin
    nággu+N+Sg+Abe:  náˊguttáá
    nággu+N+Ess:  nággun
    nággu+N+Par:  nággud
    nággu+N+Pl+Nom:  nááguh
    nággu+N+Pl+Gen: [náágui, náˊgui]
    nággu+N+Pl+Acc:  nááguid
    nággu+N+Pl+Ill:  nággoid
    nággu+N+Pl+Loc:  nááguin
    nággu+N+Pl+Com:  náˊguiguin
    nággu+N+Pl+Abe:  náˊguittáá

  Noun - táppu: # ok LAAVU
    táppu+N+Sg+Nom:  táppu
    táppu+N+Sg+Gen:  táápu
    táppu+N+Sg+Acc:  táápu
    táppu+N+Sg+Ill:  táápun
    táppu+N+Sg+Loc:  táápust
    táppu+N+Sg+Com:  táppoin
    táppu+N+Sg+Abe:  táˊputtáá
    táppu+N+Ess:  táppun
    táppu+N+Par:  táppud
    táppu+N+Pl+Nom:  táápuh
    táppu+N+Pl+Gen: [táápui, táˊpui]
    táppu+N+Pl+Acc:  táápuid
    táppu+N+Pl+Ill:  táppoid
    táppu+N+Pl+Loc:  táápuin
    táppu+N+Pl+Com:  táˊpuiguin
    táppu+N+Pl+Abe:  táˊpuittáá

  Noun - káttu: # ok LAAVU
    káttu+N+Sg+Nom:  káttu
    káttu+N+Sg+Gen:  káátu
    káttu+N+Sg+Acc:  káátu
    káttu+N+Sg+Ill:  káátun
    káttu+N+Sg+Loc:  káátust
    káttu+N+Sg+Com:  káttoin
    káttu+N+Sg+Abe:  káˊtuttáá
    káttu+N+Ess:  káttun
    káttu+N+Par:  káttud
    káttu+N+Pl+Nom:  káátuh
    káttu+N+Pl+Gen: [káátui, káˊtui]
    káttu+N+Pl+Acc:  káátuid
    káttu+N+Pl+Ill:  káttoid
    káttu+N+Pl+Loc:  káátuin
    káttu+N+Pl+Com:  káˊtuiguin
    káttu+N+Pl+Abe:  káˊtuittáá

  Noun - táttu: # ok LAAVU
    táttu+N+Sg+Nom:  táttu
    táttu+N+Sg+Gen:  táátu
    táttu+N+Sg+Acc:  táátu
    táttu+N+Sg+Ill:  táátun
    táttu+N+Sg+Loc:  táátust
    táttu+N+Sg+Com:  táttoin
    táttu+N+Sg+Abe:  táˊtuttáá
    táttu+N+Ess:  táttun
    táttu+N+Par:  táttud
    táttu+N+Pl+Nom:  táátuh
    táttu+N+Pl+Gen: [táátui, táˊtui]
    táttu+N+Pl+Acc:  táátuid
    táttu+N+Pl+Ill:  táttoid
    táttu+N+Pl+Loc:  táátuin
    táttu+N+Pl+Com:  táˊtuiguin
    táttu+N+Pl+Abe:  táˊtuittáá


  Noun - huáppu: # ok  
    huáppu+N+Sg+Nom:  huápˊpu
    huáppu+N+Sg+Gen:  huápu
    huáppu+N+Sg+Acc:  huápu
    huáppu+N+Sg+Ill:  huápun
    huáppu+N+Sg+Loc:  huápust
    huáppu+N+Sg+Com:  huápˊpoin
    huáppu+N+Sg+Abe:  huáˊputtáá
    huáppu+N+Ess:  huápˊpun
    huáppu+N+Par:  huápˊpud
    huáppu+N+Pl+Nom:  huápuh
    huáppu+N+Pl+Gen:  [huápui, huáˊpui]
    huáppu+N+Pl+Acc:  huápuid
    huáppu+N+Pl+Ill:  huápˊpoid
    huáppu+N+Pl+Loc:  huápuin
    huáppu+N+Pl+Com:  huáˊpuiguin
    huáppu+N+Pl+Abe:  huáˊpuittáá

  Noun - skuáppu: # ok  
    skuáppu+N+Sg+Nom:  skuápˊpu
    skuáppu+N+Sg+Gen:  skuápu
    skuáppu+N+Sg+Acc:  skuápu
    skuáppu+N+Sg+Ill:  skuápun
    skuáppu+N+Sg+Loc:  skuápust
    skuáppu+N+Sg+Com:  skuápˊpoin
    skuáppu+N+Sg+Abe:  skuáˊputtáá
    skuáppu+N+Ess:  skuápˊpun
    skuáppu+N+Par:  skuápˊpud
    skuáppu+N+Pl+Nom:  skuápuh
    skuáppu+N+Pl+Gen:  [skuápui, skuáˊpui]
    skuáppu+N+Pl+Acc:  skuápuid
    skuáppu+N+Pl+Ill:  skuápˊpoid
    skuáppu+N+Pl+Loc:  skuápuin
    skuáppu+N+Pl+Com:  skuáˊpuiguin
    skuáppu+N+Pl+Abe:  skuáˊpuittáá

  Noun - tuáttu: # ok LAAVU
    tuáttu+N+Sg+Nom:  tuátˊtu
    tuáttu+N+Sg+Gen:  tuátu
    tuáttu+N+Sg+Acc:  tuátu
    tuáttu+N+Sg+Ill:  tuátun
    tuáttu+N+Sg+Loc:  tuátust
    tuáttu+N+Sg+Com:  tuátˊtoin
    tuáttu+N+Sg+Abe:  tuáˊtuttáá
    tuáttu+N+Ess:  tuátˊtun
    tuáttu+N+Par:  tuátˊtud
    tuáttu+N+Pl+Nom:  tuátuh
    tuáttu+N+Pl+Gen:  [tuátui, tuáˊtui]
    tuáttu+N+Pl+Acc:  tuátuid
    tuáttu+N+Pl+Ill:  tuátˊtoid
    tuáttu+N+Pl+Loc:  tuátuin
    tuáttu+N+Pl+Com:  tuáˊtuiguin
    tuáttu+N+Pl+Abe:  tuáˊtuittáá

  Noun - vuággu: # ok VUAGGU
    vuággu+N+Sg+Nom:  vuágˊgu
    vuággu+N+Sg+Gen:  vuágu
    vuággu+N+Sg+Acc:  vuágu
    vuággu+N+Sg+Ill:  vuágun
    vuággu+N+Sg+Loc:  vuágust
    vuággu+N+Sg+Com:  vuágˊgoin
    vuággu+N+Sg+Abe:  vuáˊguttáá
    vuággu+N+Ess:  vuágˊgun
    vuággu+N+Par:  vuágˊgud
    vuággu+N+Pl+Nom:  vuáguh
    vuággu+N+Pl+Gen: [vuágui, vuáˊgui]
    vuággu+N+Pl+Acc:  vuáguid
    vuággu+N+Pl+Ill:  vuágˊgoid
    vuággu+N+Pl+Loc:  vuáguin
    vuággu+N+Pl+Com:  vuáˊguiguin
    vuággu+N+Pl+Abe:  vuáˊguittáá
